Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.29
Findings and determination by commission;
license revoked or suspended; when; censure; civil fine; stay of execution;
probation.

After the hearing the commission shall state in
writing, officially signed by the chairperson and attested to by the director,
its findings and determination and its order in the matter. If the commission
determines that the licensee has
been guilty of any violation of the Nebraska Real Estate License Act or the
rules and regulations of the commission or
the violator has been guilty of a violation of section 81-885.03,
the commission may revoke or suspend the license, enter an order censuring
the licensee, or impose a civil
fine on a licensee pursuant
to section 81-885.10 or on
a violator pursuant to section 81-885.03. The execution of a penalty
of suspension may be stayed by the commission and the licensee may be placed
on probation for the suspension period, after satisfactory completion of which
his or her license shall be fully reinstated. Any violation of the act or
the rules and regulations by the licensee during the period of probation shall
cause the immediate execution of the suspension penalty.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 29;

Laws 1975, LB 354, § 4;

Laws 1983, LB 182, § 23;

Laws 1990, LB 350, § 14;

Laws 2002, LB 863, § 20;

Laws 2009, LB30, § 9;

Laws 2010, LB691, § 4.